apertium-de-nl.de.dix
    <pardef n="d/enken__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enke</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enkst</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enkt</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enken</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enkt</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enken</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achte</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achtest</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achte</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achten</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achtet</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>achten</l>
          <r>enken<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lieb/en__vblex" c="duplicate of frag/en__vblex lern/en__vblex dank/en__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/ommen__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omme</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ommst</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ommt</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ommen</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ommt</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ommen</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amst</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amen</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amt</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amen</l>
          <r>ommen<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="frag/en__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>en<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="befreien"><i>befrei</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beleidigen"><i>beleidig</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bestellen"><i>bestell</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besuchen"><i>besuch</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bezahlen"><i>bezahl</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="borgen"><i>borg</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brauchen"><i>brauch</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="danken"><i>dank</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="entfernen"><i>entfern</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erklären"><i>erklär</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fühlen"><i>fühl</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hoffen"><i>hoff</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lieben"><i>lieb</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="machen"><i>mach</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e c="todo correct pardef?" lm="gleichen"><i>gleich</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sagen"><i>sag</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spielen"><i>spiel</i><par n="lieb/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fragen"><i>frag</i><par n="frag/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="wohnen"><i>wohn</i><par n="frag/en__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="denken"><i>d</i><par n="d/enken__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kommen"><i>k</i><par n="k/ommen__vblex"/></e>
